Arkansas, session 2025, HB1601.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 60, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
6-60-123. Requirement for career counseling and other career-related
resources — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, "career-related resources" includes
without limitation information about:
(1) Available career and technical training; and
(2) Trade industries that provide employment opportunities.
(b) The Division of Higher Education shall maintain an accessible
location on its website with a link for career counseling and other career-
related resources that are available to students and provided by state-
supported institutions of higher education.
(c) A state-supported institution of higher education shall:
(1) Maintain on its website a link to the division's career
*CRH143*
03-10-2025 11:41:25 CRH143

As Engrossed: H3/10/25 HB1601
counseling and other career-related resources available to students; and
(2) Take appropriate steps to inform students of career
counseling and other career-related resources, including without limitation
how to access the information at the state-supported institution of higher
education and from the division.
(d) The career counseling and other career-related services offered by
a state-supported institution of higher education shall remain available to a
student who has not yet graduated for up to six (6) months after the student
is no longer enrolled at the state-supported institution of higher education,
upon request.
(e) This section does not apply to a concurrently enrolled student or
a student who has enrolled at a subsequent institution of higher education.

/s/L. Johnson






















03-10-2025 11:41:25 CRH143